South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3514.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Flags SECTION 1.    Chapter 1, Title 11 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 11-1-130.    A state department, agency, institution, or political subdivision of the State, including a school district, may not use public funds to purchase a flag of the United States of America or the State of South Carolina unless the flag has been one hundred percent manufactured in the United States from articles, materials, or supplies that have been grown or one hundred percent produced or manufactured in the United States. A state department, agency, institution, or political subdivision of the State, including a school district, may continue the use of previously purchased flags until a replacement flag is necessary. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 1st day of April, 2026. Approved the 6th day of April, 2026. __________